Utah statutes.
39-1-34.   Excuse from drill -- Furloughs and leaves of absence.

Unless otherwise provided by the laws of the United States or the regulations of the National Guard Bureau, the commanding officer of any troop, battery, group, squadron or other unit shall have power, for good and sufficient reason, to excuse members of his organization from attendance at drill; he shall also have power to grant furloughs and leaves of absence, by and with the consent of the adjutant general.



Amended by Chapter 61, 1963 General Session

